Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Annual Supplement, 201581-3432.01
Repayment of qualified educational debt; authorized; eligibility.

(1) The board may repay qualified educational debt owed by an eligible graduate. Such repayment shall be made from the Engineers and Architects Regulation Fund. To be eligible for debt repayment, a recipient shall be a graduate of (a) a National Architectural Accrediting Board-accredited architecture program in Nebraska or (b) an ABET-accredited engineering program in Nebraska and shall have obtained qualified educational debt.

(2) For purposes of this section, qualified educational debt means government and commercial loans obtained by a student for postsecondary education tuition, other educational expenses, and reasonable living expenses, as determined by the board.

(3) The board may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations governing any debt repayment under this section.

Laws 2009, LB446, § 3;

Laws 2015, LB23, § 29.
August 30, 2015